Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3718
Motor club services; laws applicable.

The offering of motor club services shall be subject solely and exclusively to the provisions of sections 44-3701 to 44-3721, and the offering of such services by any duly authorized club shall not be deemed transacting business as an insurance company, association, or exchange, except as otherwise provided in sections 44-3701 to 44-3721.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 18.